Maryland, session 2025, SB0842.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 16.7–213.1 of Article – Business Regulation of the Annotated Code of
Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 16.7–213.2.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
16.5–217.2.
(A) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OR A PEACE OFFICER MAY SEIZE OTHER
TOBACCO PRODUCTS THAT ARE SOLD OR OFFERED FOR SALE IN THE STATE IN
VIOLATION OF THIS TITLE WITHOUT A WARRANT.
(B) (1) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OR PEACE OFFICER SHALL GIVE
NOTICE OF A SEIZURE TO THE PERSON FROM WHOM THE PROPERTY IS SEIZED AT
THE TIME OF SEIZURE.
(2) A NOTICE OF SEIZURE SHALL STATE THE RIGHT OF THE OWNER
OR OTHER INTERESTED PERSON TO FILE A CLAIM FOR RETURN OF THE SEIZED
PROPERTY.
(C) A PEACE OFFICER WHO SEIZES OTHER TOBACCO PRODUCTS UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL DELIVER THE SEIZED OTHER TOBACCO
PRODUCTS TO THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OR TAKE IT TO A LOCATION DESIGNATED
BY THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR.
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE OWNER
OR ANOTHER INTERESTED PERSON MAY FILE A CLAIM FOR RETURN OF THE
PROPERTY WITH THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE SEIZURE
OF THE PROPERTY.
(2) A PERSON FORFEITS ANY INTEREST IN, RIGHT TO, OR TITLE TO
THE OTHER TOBACCO PRODUCTS SEIZED FOR VIOLATION OF THIS TITLE IF THE
PERSON FAILS TO TIMELY FILE A CLAIM FOR RETURN OF THE SEIZED PROPERTY
WITHIN THE TIME ALLOWED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 305
(E) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, IF A PERSON FILES A
CLAIM FOR THE RETURN OF PROPERTY SEIZED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION, THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE
SHALL:
(1) PROMPTLY ACT ON THE CLAIM AND HOLD AN INFORMAL HEARING;
AND
(2) UNLESS THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OR THE EXECUTIVE
DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE HAS SATISFACTORY EVIDENCE THAT THE OWNER OR
PERSON WAS NOT IN COMPLIANCE WITH ANY PROVISION OF THIS TITLE AT THE TIME
OF SEIZURE, DIRECT RETURN OF THE SEIZED PROPERTY.
(F) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE
SHALL GRANT OR DENY THE CLAIM FOR RETURN OF SEIZED OTHER TOBACCO
PRODUCTS BY MAILING THE OWNER OR PERSON A NOTICE OF FINAL
DETERMINATION.
(G) A PERSON WHO POSSESSED OR OFFERED FOR SALE OTHER TOBACCO
PRODUCTS THAT ARE SEIZED UNDER THIS SECTION IS NOT RELIEVED FROM
RESPONSIBILITY FOR:
(1) ANY PENALTY UNDER THIS TITLE OR TITLE 16 OR TITLE 16.7 OF
THIS ARTICLE; OR
(2) REIMBURSEMENT OF THE COSTS OF TRANSPORTATION, STORAGE,
OR DISPOSAL OF THE SEIZED PROPERTY.
(H) (1) OTHER TOBACCO PRODUCTS SEIZED BY THE STATE UNDER THIS
TITLE SHALL BE TRANSPORTED, STORED, AND DESTROYED IN COMPLIANCE WITH
APPLICABLE LOCAL, STATE, AND FEDERAL LAW.
(2) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S
DESIGNEE SHALL KEEP A RECORD OF ALL PROPERTY DESTROYED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION THAT INCLUDES A DESCRIPTION OF:
(I) THE NATURE OF THE PROPERTY;
(II) THE QUANTITY OF THE PROPERTY;
(III) THE REASON FOR THE SEIZURE OF THE PROPERTY; AND
(IV) THE MANNER OF DESTRUCTION.
– 3 –

Ch. 305 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) (I) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR MAY IMPOSE AND COLLECT
COSTS SUFFICIENT TO COVER TRANSPORTATION, STORAGE, AND DISPOSAL OF
OTHER TOBACCO PRODUCTS SEIZED BY THE STATE UNDER THIS SECTION.
(II) FAILURE TO PAY COSTS UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL BE CONSIDERED GROUNDS FOR DENIAL OR REVOCATION OF A
LICENSE UNDER THIS TITLE.
(4) (I) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR MAY RECOVER, IN AN ACTION
BROUGHT UNDER THIS SECTION, REASONABLE EXPENSES INCURRED IN
INVESTIGATING AND PREPARING THE CASE, INCLUDING ATTORNEY’S FEES.
(II) FAILURE TO PAY EXPENSES UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE CONSIDERED GROUNDS FOR DENIAL OR REVOCATION
OF A LICENSE UNDER THIS TITLE.
(5) (I) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL POST A NOTICE OF EACH
SEIZURE AND FORFEITURE ON THE COMMISSION’S WEBSITE FOR A PERIOD OF NOT
LESS THAN 1 YEAR AFTER THE NOTICE OF SEIZURE UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION.
(II) NOTICE UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH
SHALL INCLUDE:
1. A DESCRIPTION OF THE PROPERTY SEIZED;
2. THE REASON FOR THE SEIZURE; AND
3. THE TIME AND PLACE OF THE SEIZURE.
16.7–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Electronic smoking devices manufacturer” means a person that:
(1) manufactures, mixes, or otherwise produces electronic smoking devices
intended for sale in the State, including electronic smoking devices intended for sale in the
United States through an importer; and
(2) (i) sells electronic smoking devices to a consumer, if the consumer
purchases or orders the devices through the mail, a computer network, a telephonic
network, or another electronic network, A LICENSED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 305
WHOLESALER, a licensed electronic smoking devices wholesaler distributor, or a licensed
electronic smoking devices wholesaler importer in the State;
(ii) if the electronic smoking devices manufacturer also holds a
license to act as an electronic smoking devices retailer or a vape shop vendor, sells electronic
smoking devices in the same manner as a vape shop vendor to consumers located in the
State; or
(iii) unless otherwise prohibited or restricted under local law, this
article, or the Criminal Law Article, distributes sample electronic smoking devices to a
licensed electronic smoking devices retailer or vape shop vendor.
(F) “ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER” MEANS A PERSON
THAT:
(1) HOLDS ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES FOR SALE TO ANOTHER
PERSON FOR RESALE; OR
(2) SELLS ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES TO ANOTHER PERSON FOR
RESALE.
[(f)] (G) “Electronic smoking devices wholesaler distributor” means a person
that:
(1) obtains at least 70% of its electronic smoking devices from a holder of
an electronic smoking devices manufacturer license under this subtitle or a business entity
located in the United States; and
(2) (i) holds electronic smoking devices for sale to another person for
resale; or
(ii) sells electronic smoking devices to another person for resale.
[(g)] (H) “Electronic smoking devices wholesaler importer” means a person that:
(1) obtains at least 70% of its electronic smoking devices from a business
entity located in a foreign country; and
(2) (i) holds electronic smoking devices for sale to another person for
resale; or
(ii) sells electronic smoking devices to another person for resale.
[(h)] (I) “Executive Director” means the Executive Director of the Alcohol,
Tobacco, and Cannabis Commission.
– 5 –

Ch. 305 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(i)] (J) “License” means:
(1) a license issued by the Executive Director under § 16.7–203(a) of this
title to:
(i) act as a licensed electronic smoking devices manufacturer;
(II) ACT AS A LICENSED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES
WHOLESALER;
[(ii)] (III) act as a licensed electronic smoking devices wholesaler
distributor; or
[(iii)] (IV) act as a licensed electronic smoking devices wholesaler
importer; or
(2) a license issued by the clerk under § 16.7–203(b) of this title to:
(i) act as a licensed electronic smoking devices retailer; or
(ii) act as a licensed vape shop vendor.
[(j)] (K) “Sell” means to exchange or transfer, or to agree to exchange or
transfer, title or possession of property, in any manner or by any means, for consideration.
[(k)] (L) “Vape shop vendor” means an electronic smoking devices business that
sells electronic smoking devices and related accessories to consumers on the premises of its
place of business.
[(l)] (M) “Vaping liquid” means a liquid that:
(1) consists of propylene glycol, vegetable glycerin, or other similar
substance;
(2) may or may not contain natural or artificial flavors;
(3) may or may not contain nicotine; and
(4) converts to vapor intended for inhalation when heated in an electronic
device.
16.7–201.
(a) A person must hold an appropriate license before the person may act as:
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 305
(1) an electronic smoking devices manufacturer;
(2) an electronic smoking devices retailer;
(3) AN ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER;
[(3)] (4) an electronic smoking devices wholesaler distributor;
[(4)] (5) an electronic smoking devices wholesaler importer; or
[(5)] (6) a vape shop vendor.
(b) A place of business in which a person acts as an electronic smoking devices
retailer or a vape shop vendor must hold an appropriate license.
16.7–202.
(a) (1) An applicant for a license to act as an electronic smoking devices
manufacturer, ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER, electronic smoking
devices wholesaler distributor, or electronic smoking devices wholesaler importer shall:
(i) obtain an appropriate county license by submitting an
application to the Executive Director on the form and containing the information that the
Executive Director requires;
(ii) indicate the licenses for which the applicant is applying; and
(iii) except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, pay to the
Executive Director a fee of $25 for each license for which the applicant applies.
(2) An applicant for a license to act as an ELECTRONIC SMOKING
DEVICES WHOLESALER, electronic smoking devices wholesaler distributor, or electronic
smoking devices wholesaler importer shall pay to the Executive Director a fee of $150.
16.7–203.
(a) The Executive Director shall issue an appropriate license to each applicant
that meets the requirements of this subtitle for a license to act as an electronic smoking
devices manufacturer, ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER, electronic
smoking devices wholesaler distributor, or electronic smoking devices wholesaler importer.
16.7–204.
(a) An electronic smoking devices manufacturer license authorizes the licensee
to:
– 7 –

Ch. 305 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) sell electronic smoking devices to:
(i) a licensed electronic smoking devices wholesaler located in the
State;
(ii) an electronic smoking devices wholesaler or retailer located
outside the State if the electronic smoking devices may be sold lawfully in Maryland; AND
(iii) a licensed vape shop vendor; [and
(iv) a consumer if:
1. the licensee manufactured the devices; and
2. the consumer purchases or orders the devices through the
mail, a computer network, a telephonic network, or another electronic network;]
(2) if the electronic smoking devices manufacturer licensee also holds a
license to act as an electronic smoking devices retailer or a vape shop vendor, transfer
electronic smoking devices to inventory for sale under the retail license or vape shop license;
and
(3) except as otherwise prohibited or restricted under local law, this article,
or the Criminal Law Article, distribute electronic smoking devices products to a licensed
electronic smoking devices retailer or vape shop vendor.
(b) An electronic smoking devices retailer license authorizes the licensee to:
(1) sell electronic smoking devices to consumers;
(2) buy electronic smoking devices from an ELECTRONIC SMOKING
DEVICES WHOLESALER, electronic smoking devices wholesaler distributor, or electronic
smoking devices wholesaler importer;
(3) if the electronic smoking devices retailer licensee also holds a license to
act as an electronic smoking devices manufacturer, sell at retail electronic smoking devices
manufactured under the manufacturer license; and
(4) except as otherwise prohibited or restricted under local law, this article,
the Criminal Law Article, or § 24–305 of the Health – General Article, distribute sample
electronic smoking devices products to consumers in the State.
(c) An ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER LICENSE, electronic
smoking devices wholesaler distributor license, or electronic smoking devices wholesaler
importer license authorizes the licensee to:
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 305
(1) sell electronic smoking devices to electronic smoking devices retailers
and vape shop vendors;
(2) buy electronic smoking devices directly from an electronic smoking
devices manufacturer and an ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER, electronic
smoking devices wholesaler distributor, or electronic smoking devices wholesaler importer;
(3) hold electronic smoking devices; and
(4) sell electronic smoking devices to another licensed ELECTRONIC
SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER, electronic smoking devices wholesaler distributor, or
electronic smoking devices wholesaler importer.
(d) A vape shop vendor license authorizes the licensee to:
(1) sell electronic smoking devices as a vape shop vendor to consumers on
the premises of the licensee’s place of business;
(2) if the vape shop vendor licensee also holds a license to act as an
electronic smoking devices manufacturer, sell at retail on the vape shop vendor premises
electronic smoking devices manufactured under the manufacturer license; and
(3) buy electronic smoking devices from an electronic smoking devices
manufacturer, AN ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER, an electronic
smoking devices wholesaler distributor, or an electronic smoking devices wholesaler
importer.
16.7–206.
(a) (1) A licensed electronic smoking devices retailer or a licensed vape shop
vendor may not assign the license.
(2) If a licensed ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER,
electronic smoking devices wholesaler distributor, or electronic smoking devices wholesaler
importer sells the licensee’s electronic smoking devices business and pays to the Executive
Director a license assignment fee of $10, the licensee may assign the license to the buyer of
the business if the buyer otherwise qualifies under this title for an electronic smoking
devices wholesaler’s distributor or importer license.
(b) If the electronic smoking devices business of a licensee is transferred because
of bankruptcy, death, incompetency, receivership, or otherwise by operation of law, the
Executive Director shall transfer the license without charge to the new owner of the
licensee’s business if the transferee otherwise qualifies under this title for the license being
transferred.
– 9 –

Ch. 305 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) (1) If a licensed ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER,
electronic smoking devices wholesaler distributor, or electronic smoking devices wholesaler
importer surrenders the license to the Executive Director and if no disciplinary proceedings
are pending against the licensee, the Executive Director shall refund a pro rata portion of
the license fee for the unexpired term of the license.
(2) A licensed electronic smoking devices retailer or a licensed vape shop
vendor is not allowed a refund for the unexpired term of the license.
16.7–211.
(a) A person may not act, attempt to act, or offer to act as an electronic smoking
devices manufacturer, an electronic smoking devices retailer, AN ELECTRONIC SMOKING
DEVICES WHOLESALER, an electronic smoking devices wholesaler distributor, an
electronic smoking devices wholesaler importer, or a vape shop vendor in the State unless
the person has an appropriate license.
16.7–213.1.
(A) EACH ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER DISTRIBUTOR AND
ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER IMPORTER SHALL:
(1) RECEIVE AN INVOICE FOR EACH PURCHASE OF ELECTRONIC
SMOKING DEVICES;
(2) KEEP A RECORD OF ALL ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES
RECEIVED, TO WHICH THE ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER
DISTRIBUTOR OR ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER IMPORTER SHALL
POST EACH DAY:
(I) THE INVOICE NUMBER;
(II) THE DATE OF RECEIPT;
(III) THE QUANTITY RECEIVED;
(IV) THE BRAND;
(V) THE MANUFACTURER; AND
(VI) THE NAME OF THE PERSON FROM WHOM THE ELECTRONIC
SMOKING DEVICES ARE RECEIVED;
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 305
(3) (I) KEEP A RECORD OF THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF EACH
ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES RETAILER TO WHICH A SALE IS MADE; AND
(II) PREPARE FOR EACH SALE OF ELECTRONIC SMOKING
DEVICES TO A RETAILER AN INVOICE THAT SHOWS THE POLITICAL SUBDIVISION
WHERE THE RETAILER IS LOCATED; AND
(4) KEEP A COMPLETE AND ACCURATE RECORD OF EACH SALE OF
ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES TO AN OUT–OF–STATE PERSON FOR RESALE TO
OUT–OF–STATE CONSUMERS.
(B) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
EACH ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER DISTRIBUTOR AND
ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER IMPORTER SHALL MAKE AN
INVENTORY RECORD EACH MONTH OF ALL ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES ON THE
PREMISES OR UNDER THE CONTROL OF THE ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES
WHOLESALER DISTRIBUTOR OR ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER
IMPORTER:
(I) AT THE BEGINNING OR END OF THE MONTH; OR
(II) ON ANOTHER SPECIFIC DAY OF THE MONTH, IF THE
ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER DISTRIBUTOR OR ELECTRONIC
SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER IMPORTER FINDS IT MORE PRACTICABLE TO TAKE
INVENTORY ON THAT DAY.
(2) ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES TRANSFERRED TO RETAIL
STOCK BY WRITTEN MEMORANDUM NEED NOT BE INCLUDED IN THE INVENTORY
RECORD.
(C) EACH ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER DISTRIBUTOR AND
ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER IMPORTER SHALL:
(1) KEEP THE RECORDS REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION FOR 6 YEARS OR
FOR A SHORTER TIME SET BY THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR; AND
(2) ALLOW THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR TO EXAMINE THE RECORDS.
16.7–213.3.
(A) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OR A PEACE OFFICER MAY SEIZE
ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES THAT ARE SOLD OR OFFERED FOR SALE IN THE
STATE IN VIOLATION OF THIS TITLE WITHOUT A WARRANT.
– 11 –

Ch. 305 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(B) (1) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OR PEACE OFFICER SHALL GIVE
NOTICE OF A SEIZURE TO THE PERSON FROM WHICH THE PROPERTY IS SEIZED AT
THE TIME OF SEIZURE.
(2) A NOTICE OF SEIZURE SHALL STATE THE RIGHT OF THE OWNER
OR OTHER INTERESTED PERSON TO FILE A CLAIM FOR RETURN OF THE SEIZED
PROPERTY.
(C) A PEACE OFFICER WHO SEIZES ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL DELIVER THE SEIZED PROPERTY TO THE
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OR TAKE IT TO A LOCATION DESIGNATED BY THE EXECUTIVE
DIRECTOR.
(D) (C) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
OWNER OR INTERESTED PERSON MAY FILE A CLAIM FOR RETURN OF THE PROPERTY
WITH THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE SEIZURE OF THE
PROPERTY.
(2) A PERSON FORFEITS ANY INTEREST IN, RIGHT TO, OR TITLE TO
THE ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES SEIZED FOR VIOLATION OF THIS TITLE IF THE
PERSON FAILS TO TIMELY FILE A CLAIM FOR RETURN OF THE SEIZED PROPERTY
WITHIN THE TIME ALLOWED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(E) (D) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (F) (E) OF THIS SECTION, IF A PERSON
FILES A CLAIM FOR THE RETURN OF PROPERTY SEIZED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION, THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S
DESIGNEE SHALL:
(1) PROMPTLY ACT ON THE CLAIM AND HOLD AN INFORMAL A
HEARING IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 16.7–208 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) UNLESS THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OR THE EXECUTIVE
DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE HAS SATISFACTORY EVIDENCE THAT THE OWNER OR
PERSON WAS NOT IN COMPLIANCE WITH ANY PROVISION OF THIS TITLE AT THE TIME
OF SEIZURE, DIRECT RETURN OF THE SEIZED PROPERTY.
(F) (E) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S
DESIGNEE SHALL GRANT OR DENY THE CLAIM FOR RETURN OF SEIZED ELECTRONIC
SMOKING DEVICES BY MAILING THE OWNER OR PERSON A NOTICE OF FINAL
DETERMINATION.
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 305
(G) (F) A PERSON WHO POSSESSED OR OFFERED FOR SALE ELECTRONIC
SMOKING DEVICES THAT ARE SEIZED UNDER THIS SECTION IS NOT RELIEVED FROM
RESPONSIBILITY FOR:
(1) ANY PENALTY UNDER THIS TITLE OR TITLE 16 OR TITLE 16.5 OF
THIS ARTICLE; OR
(2) REIMBURSEMENT OF THE COSTS OF TRANSPORTATION, STORAGE,
OR DISPOSAL OF THE SEIZED PROPERTY.
(H) (1) ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES SEIZED BY THE STATE UNDER
THIS TITLE SHALL BE TRANSPORTED, STORED, AND DESTROYED IN COMPLIANCE
WITH APPLICABLE LOCAL, STATE, AND FEDERAL LAW.
(2) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S
DESIGNEE, SHALL KEEP A RECORD OF ALL PROPERTY DESTROYED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION THAT INCLUDES A DESCRIPTION OF:
(I) THE NATURE OF THE PROPERTY;
(II) THE QUANTITY OF THE PROPERTY;
(III) THE REASON FOR THE SEIZURE OF THE PROPERTY; AND
(IV) THE MANNER OF DESTRUCTION.
(3) (I) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR MAY IMPOSE AND COLLECT
COSTS SUFFICIENT TO COVER TRANSPORTATION, STORAGE, AND DISPOSAL OF
ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES SEIZED BY THE STATE UNDER THIS SECTION.
(II) FAILURE TO PAY COSTS UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL BE CONSIDERED GROUNDS FOR DENIAL OR REVOCATION OF A
LICENSE UNDER THIS TITLE.
(4) (I) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR MAY RECOVER, IN AN ACTION
BROUGHT UNDER THIS SECTION, REASONABLE EXPENSES INCURRED IN
INVESTIGATING AND PREPARING THE CASE, INCLUDING ATTORNEY’S FEES.
(II) FAILURE TO PAY EXPENSES UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE CONSIDERED GROUNDS FOR DENIAL OR REVOCATION
OF A LICENSE UNDER THIS TITLE.
(5) (I) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL POST A NOTICE OF EACH
SEIZURE AND FORFEITURE ON THE COMMISSION’S WEBSITE FOR A PERIOD OF NOT
– 13 –

Ch. 305 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
LESS THAN 1 YEAR AFTER THE NOTICE OF SEIZURE UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION.
(II) NOTICE UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH
SHALL INCLUDE:
1. A DESCRIPTION OF THE PROPERTY SEIZED;
2. THE REASON FOR THE SEIZURE; AND
3. THE TIME AND PLACE OF THE SEIZURE.
16.7–213.4.
THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS
SUBTITLE.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 14 –